Virginia statutes. Title 50. Partnerships.
Article 7. Assignment of Partnership Interests.

§ 50-73.44.
Nature of partnership interest.

A partnership interest is personal property.

History.

1985, c. 607.

Law Review.

For article reviewing changes in Virginia corporate and business law from June 2001 through May 2002, see 37 U. Rich. L. Rev. 1 (2002).

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see

2A M.J. Assignments, § 5.

§ 50-73.45.
Assignment of partnership interest.

Except as provided in the partnership agreement, a partnership interest is assignable in whole or in part. An assignment of a partnership interest does not dissolve a limited partnership or entitle the assignee to become or to exercise any rights of a partner. An assignment entitles the assignee to receive, to the extent assigned, only the distribution to which the assignor would be entitled. Except as provided in the partnership agreement, a partner ceases to be a partner upon assignment of all his partnership interest.

History.

1985, c. 607.

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see

14A M.J. Partnership, § 97.

CIRCUIT COURT OPINIONS

All partnership interests are freely assignable unless the partnership agreement provides otherwise. —

Section

50-73.45

does not require a party acquiring limited partnership interests to give notice to other partners not involved in the transaction, and investors in a limited partnership assume the risk that hostile parties might acquire a controlling interest in the partnership. Friedberg v. Hague Park Apts., 61 Va. Cir. 589, 2001 Va. Cir. LEXIS 518 (Norfolk Dec. 3, 2001).

Dissolution triggered. —

By assigning her entire partnership interest to her revocable trust, a mother withdrew from a limited partnership, and the limited partnership had no general partner since when the mother assigned her general partnership interest, it automatically converted to a limited partnership interest under a conversion provision, and triggered dissolution under §

50-73.45

as: (1) a transfer of all of a general partner’s interest was an event of withdrawal under §

50-73.28

; (2) under §

50-73.49

, the withdrawal of the sole remaining general partner triggered dissolution unless all the remaining partners agreed to continue the limited partnership; (3) the children did not so agree; and (4) at least one general partner was required to maintain a limited partnership under §

50-73.11

.Smith v. Smith, 81 Va. Cir. 135, 2010 Va. Cir. LEXIS 114 (Fairfax County Aug. 25, 2010).

§ 50-73.46.
Repealed by Acts 2004, c. 601.

Cross references.

For current provisions concerning rights of creditor to interest, see §

50-73.46:1

.

§ 50-73.46:1.
Partner’s transferable interest subject to charging order.

On application by a judgment creditor of a partner or of a partner’s assignee, a court having jurisdiction may charge the transferable interest of the judgment debtor to satisfy the judgment. To the extent so charged, the judgment creditor has only the right to receive any distribution or distributions to which the judgment debtor would otherwise have been entitled in respect of the interest.

A charging order constitutes a lien on the judgment debtor’s transferable interest in the limited partnership.

This chapter does not deprive a partner or a partner’s assignee of a right under exemption laws with respect to the judgment debtor’s interest in the limited partnership.

The entry of a charging order is the exclusive remedy by which a judgment creditor of a partner or of a partner’s assignee may satisfy a judgment out of the judgment debtor’s transferable interest in the limited partnership.

No creditor of a partner or of a partner’s assignee shall have any right to obtain possession of, or otherwise exercise legal or equitable remedies with respect to, the property of the limited partnership.

History.

2004, c. 601; 2006, c. 912.

The 2006 amendments.

The 2006 amendment by c. 912 rewrote the section.

§ 50-73.47.
Right of assignee to become limited partner.

An assignee of a partnership interest, including an assignee of a general partner, may become a limited partner if and to the extent that (i) the assignor gives the assignee that right in accordance with authority described in writing in the partnership agreement, or (ii) all other partners consent.

An assignee who has become a limited partner has, to the extent assigned, the rights and powers, and is subject to the restrictions and liabilities, of a limited partner under the partnership agreement and this chapter. An assignee who becomes a limited partner also is liable for the obligation of his assignor to make and return contributions as provided in Articles 5 (§

50-73.32

et seq.) and 6 (§

50-73.36

et seq.) of this chapter. However, the assignee is not obligated for liabilities unknown to the assignee at the time he became a limited partner.

If an assignee of a partnership interest becomes a limited partner, the assignor is not released from his liability to the limited partnership under §§

50-73.18

and

50-73.33

.

History.

1985, c. 607; 1987, c. 702.

§ 50-73.48.
Power of estate of deceased or incapacitated partner.

If a partner who is an individual dies or a court of competent jurisdiction adjudges him to be incapacitated, the partner’s executor, administrator, conservator, or other legal representative may exercise all the partner’s rights for the purpose of settling his estate or administering his property including any power the partner had to give an assignee the right to become a limited partner. If a partner is a corporation, trust, or other entity and is dissolved or terminated, the powers of that partner may be exercised by its legal representative or successor.

History.

1985, c. 607; 1997, c. 801.

CIRCUIT COURT OPINIONS

Illustrative cases. —

Amendment which a general partner and several limited partners approved to a partnership agreement, which purported to extend a limited partnership for 25 years, was not valid because the partnership agreement required that changes be approved by all partners, and the amendment was not submitted to a deceased limited partner’s personal representative for approval. Friedberg v. Hague Park Apts., 61 Va. Cir. 589, 2001 Va. Cir. LEXIS 518 (Norfolk Dec. 3, 2001).